Utah statutes.
7-3-34.   Contents of examination report of board of directors -- Failure to
make and file report as misdemeanor.
The report required by Subsection 7-3-33(3) shall contain a statement of the
assets and liabilities of the bank as shown by its books, and any deductions
for the assets or additions to the liabilities which the directors, an
examining committee, or examiner after the examination, may recommend. It
shall also contain a detailed statement of loans, if any, which in their
opinion are worthless or doubtful, together with their reasons for so
regarding them, also a statement of loans made on collateral security which in
their opinion are insufficiently secured, giving in each case the amount of
the loan, the name and market value of the collateral, if it has any market
value, and, if without market value, a statement of that fact and its actual
value as near as it is possible to ascertain. The report shall also contain a
statement of overdrafts with the names of the persons owing the same and the
amounts of those they consider worthless or doubtful, and a full statement of
other matters which affect the solvency and soundness of the bank. If the
directors of any bank wilfully fail to make and file, or cause to be made and
filed, the examination and report in the manner and within the time specified,
each director of the bank shall be guilty of a class C misdemeanor.
